Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,142
Plan for location and boundaries; approval required.

Before any local housing agency shall construct any new development for housing purposes, it shall submit to the governing body of the city or county creating such agency, as the case may be, or to the governing body of the political subdivision which has zoning jurisdiction for the site or sites of such new development, in the case of regional housing agencies, a plan indicating the general location or locations and boundaries of the proposed site or sites for any such development, which plans shall be subject to the approval of such governing body, and such governing body may, in its discretion, submit such plan to the planning department, if any, of the city or county, as the case may be, for that department's comments and recommendations.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 71;

Laws 2018, LB304, § 4.
July 19, 2018